Utah statutes.
79-3-510.   Protection of school and institutional trust land interests
relating to paleontological resources.
(1)  The School and Institutional Trust Lands Administration shall develop
policies and procedures for the excavation, preservation, placement in a
repository, curation, and exhibition of critical paleontological resources
from school and institutional trust lands that:
(a)  are consistent with the provisions of the school and institutional land
grants; and
(b)  insure that primary consideration is given, on a site or project specific
basis, for the support of the beneficiaries of the school and institutional
land grants.
(2)  Consistent with the provisions of the school and institutional land
grants, the School and Institutional Trust Lands Administration may:
(a)  preserve and develop sites found on school and institutional trust lands
for scientific or educational purposes; and
(b)  provide for the disposition of sites found on school and institutional
trust lands, after the appropriate level of data recovery, for preservation,
development, or economic purposes.
